District of Columbia statutes.
10-202

Composition; selection; tenure; qualifications.

The Board shall consist of 7 members as follows: a representative of the Mayor of the District of Columbia selected by the Mayor; a representative of the Board of Education selected by that Board; the Superintendent of the National Capital Parks ex-officio; and 4 members, who shall have been for 5 years immediately preceding their selection bona fide residents of the District of Columbia, appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia for a term of 4 years each, except the original appointments which shall be for terms of 1, 2, 3, and 4 years, respectively. The appointment of the 4 citizens shall be without regard to race, sex, or creed, and shall take judicious account of the various parent, civic, and other organizations through which residents of the District voice their civic wishes and advance the common welfare. The 2 members of the Board representing the Mayor and the Board of Education shall be designated annually by their respective agencies.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 261, ch. 265, art. I, § 1
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.
1973 Ed., § 8-202.
1981 Ed., § 8-202.